District of Columbia statutes.
19-1301.06

Common law of trusts; principles of equity.

The common law of trusts and principles of equity supplement this chapter, except to the extent modified by this chapter or another statute of the District of Columbia.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 106 of the Uniform Trust Code.